src/nouns/nouns-femi.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Nom +Fem +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
Noun;

LEXICON Noun
Feminine;

LEXICON FemiNomInf
+Nom+Fem+Sg:0   #;
+Nom+Fem+Pl:^s  #;

LEXICON Feminine
abée	FemiNomInf;
ablution	FemiNomInf;
abrogation	FemiNomInf;
absurdité	FemiNomInf;
accession	FemiNomInf;
accumulatrice	FemiNomInf;
acidose	FemiNomInf;
acrostiche	FemiNomInf;
acupuncture	FemiNomInf;
adjonction	FemiNomInf;
adulte	FemiNomInf;
aéronomie	FemiNomInf;
affinité	FemiNomInf;
agonie	FemiNomInf;
aigle	FemiNomInf;
aisance	FemiNomInf;
alcoolisation	FemiNomInf;
aliénité	FemiNomInf;
allogène	FemiNomInf;
altérité	FemiNomInf;
amanite	FemiNomInf;
amblyopie	FemiNomInf;
amie	FemiNomInf;
amphibologie	FemiNomInf;
anæsthésique	FemiNomInf;
anche	FemiNomInf;
anémie	FemiNomInf;
anglophilie	FemiNomInf;
animosité	FemiNomInf;
anonymie	FemiNomInf;
anthropisation	FemiNomInf;
antiphrase	FemiNomInf;
apnée	FemiNomInf;
approche	FemiNomInf;
arachnoïde	FemiNomInf;
archéologue	FemiNomInf;
argumentation	FemiNomInf;
aromathérapie	FemiNomInf;
artériographie	FemiNomInf;
asepsie	FemiNomInf;
assistance	FemiNomInf;
astrologue	FemiNomInf;
athénée	FemiNomInf;
attribution	FemiNomInf;
auréole	FemiNomInf;
autodestruction	FemiNomInf;
automitrailleuse	FemiNomInf;
autostoppeuse	FemiNomInf;
aveugle	FemiNomInf;
azoospermie	FemiNomInf;
badiane	FemiNomInf;
bajoue	FemiNomInf;
baliste	FemiNomInf;
bande	FemiNomInf;
baratte	FemiNomInf;
baronne	FemiNomInf;
basket	FemiNomInf;
Batave	FemiNomInf;
bayadère	FemiNomInf;
belette	FemiNomInf;
benne	FemiNomInf;
bertrandite	FemiNomInf;
BFF	FemiNomInf;
bienséance	FemiNomInf;
billevesée	FemiNomInf;
biodynamie	FemiNomInf;
biomolécule	FemiNomInf;
birème	FemiNomInf;
blanchaille	FemiNomInf;
blondinette	FemiNomInf;
bohémienne	FemiNomInf;
bonde	FemiNomInf;
botte	FemiNomInf;
bouffe	FemiNomInf;
boulimie	FemiNomInf;
bourrée	FemiNomInf;
boxe	FemiNomInf;
brasure	FemiNomInf;
brigade	FemiNomInf;
broche	FemiNomInf;
brucellose	FemiNomInf;
bûcheuse	FemiNomInf;
butineuse	FemiNomInf;
cabine	FemiNomInf;
cæcité	FemiNomInf;
calanque	FemiNomInf;
calorimètre	FemiNomInf;
camisole	FemiNomInf;
cancérologue	FemiNomInf;
cannibalisation	FemiNomInf;
capilotade	FemiNomInf;
caquiste	FemiNomInf;
carboxyméthylcellulose	FemiNomInf;
carlingue	FemiNomInf;
cartographie	FemiNomInf;
casse-noix	FemiNomInf;
catapulte	FemiNomInf;
catholicité	FemiNomInf;
cavitation	FemiNomInf;
celtitude	FemiNomInf;
cérémonie	FemiNomInf;
cétose	FemiNomInf;
chambrée	FemiNomInf;
chape	FemiNomInf;
châtaigneraie	FemiNomInf;
chemisette	FemiNomInf;
chimaphile	FemiNomInf;
cholestérolémie	FemiNomInf;
Chtimi	FemiNomInf;
cinémathèque	FemiNomInf;
civettone	FemiNomInf;
clenche	FemiNomInf;
coccidie	FemiNomInf;
cohorte	FemiNomInf;
coloc	FemiNomInf;
commémoration	FemiNomInf;
compétence	FemiNomInf;
concoction	FemiNomInf;
confrontation	FemiNomInf;
conservation	FemiNomInf;
contestation	FemiNomInf;
contusion	FemiNomInf;
coquetterie	FemiNomInf;
corrosion	FemiNomInf;
couenne	FemiNomInf;
coursive	FemiNomInf;
création	FemiNomInf;
crisette	FemiNomInf;
crudité	FemiNomInf;
cuite	FemiNomInf;
cyclopentadécanone	FemiNomInf;
damoiselle	FemiNomInf;
décence	FemiNomInf;
déconstruction	FemiNomInf;
déformation	FemiNomInf;
démarche	FemiNomInf;
dénaturation	FemiNomInf;
déprédation	FemiNomInf;
descente	FemiNomInf;
destitution	FemiNomInf;
dévitalisation	FemiNomInf;
dictature	FemiNomInf;
dioxine	FemiNomInf;
dissension	FemiNomInf;
dizaine	FemiNomInf;
dorure	FemiNomInf;
dramaturge	FemiNomInf;
dune	FemiNomInf;
déconvenue	FemiNomInf;
échappée	FemiNomInf;
écorchure	FemiNomInf;
église	FemiNomInf;
électrosynthèse	FemiNomInf;
embouchure	FemiNomInf;
énamine	FemiNomInf;
endossataire	FemiNomInf;
enthalpie	FemiNomInf;
envergure	FemiNomInf;
épigraphe	FemiNomInf;
épuisette	FemiNomInf;
escadre	FemiNomInf;
essayeuse	FemiNomInf;
ethnicité	FemiNomInf;
étudiante	FemiNomInf;
exacerbation	FemiNomInf;
exhérédation	FemiNomInf;
exploration	FemiNomInf;
extrusion	FemiNomInf;
faim	FemiNomInf;
fatimide	FemiNomInf;
femme	FemiNomInf;
feuillette	FemiNomInf;
fileuse	FemiNomInf;
flambe	FemiNomInf;
floriculture	FemiNomInf;
fonction	FemiNomInf;
foucade	FemiNomInf;
fracture	FemiNomInf;
frênaie	FemiNomInf;
frugalité	FemiNomInf;
gabegie	FemiNomInf;
gamine	FemiNomInf;
gastromancie	FemiNomInf;
gêne	FemiNomInf;
geôle	FemiNomInf;
gérontologie	FemiNomInf;
glèbe	FemiNomInf;
gomme	FemiNomInf;
gracieuseté	FemiNomInf;
grève	FemiNomInf;
guêpière	FemiNomInf;
guitare	FemiNomInf;
Haïti	FemiNomInf;
hauteur	FemiNomInf;
hémiplégie	FemiNomInf;
hernioplastie	FemiNomInf;
hispanophile	FemiNomInf;
horizontale	FemiNomInf;
huilerie	FemiNomInf;
hydrogamie	FemiNomInf;
hyperhidrose	FemiNomInf;
hyposensibilité	FemiNomInf;
idéologie	FemiNomInf;
immobilité	FemiNomInf;
implacabilité	FemiNomInf;
inactivité	FemiNomInf;
inconvenance	FemiNomInf;
inégalité	FemiNomInf;
informatique	FemiNomInf;
inorganisation	FemiNomInf;
institutrice	FemiNomInf;
interdépendance	FemiNomInf;
introduction	FemiNomInf;
irrigation	FemiNomInf;
jante	FemiNomInf;
jouabilité	FemiNomInf;
kabbaliste	FemiNomInf;
labiodentale	FemiNomInf;
landwehr	FemiNomInf;
lavande	FemiNomInf;
lentille	FemiNomInf;
libération	FemiNomInf;
linéation	FemiNomInf;
lithosphère	FemiNomInf;
lonsdaléite	FemiNomInf;
lunaison	FemiNomInf;
macroéconomie	FemiNomInf;
maille	FemiNomInf;
malbouffe	FemiNomInf;
mamzelle	FemiNomInf;
manouche	FemiNomInf;
marée	FemiNomInf;
martyrologie	FemiNomInf;
matrice	FemiNomInf;
médiéviste	FemiNomInf;
mémétique	FemiNomInf;
méritocratie	FemiNomInf;
métallurgie	FemiNomInf;
métraduction	FemiNomInf;
micrographie	FemiNomInf;
minauderie	FemiNomInf;
miscibilité	FemiNomInf;
modernité	FemiNomInf;
mondanité	FemiNomInf;
moquerie	FemiNomInf;
motivation	FemiNomInf;
moyenne	FemiNomInf;
muserolle	FemiNomInf;
myosine	FemiNomInf;
nandrolone	FemiNomInf;
nécessité	FemiNomInf;
nervosité	FemiNomInf;
nième	FemiNomInf;
nonchalance	FemiNomInf;
nucléosynthèse	FemiNomInf;
névrite	FemiNomInf;
occlusive	FemiNomInf;
oenologue	FemiNomInf;
olympiade	FemiNomInf;
ophtalmologie	FemiNomInf;
oreillette	FemiNomInf;
orthopédie	FemiNomInf;
outrance	FemiNomInf;
page	FemiNomInf;
pâleur	FemiNomInf;
papillote	FemiNomInf;
parcimonie	FemiNomInf;
parure	FemiNomInf;
patrie	FemiNomInf;
pédiculose	FemiNomInf;
pénétrabilité	FemiNomInf;
péremption	FemiNomInf;
péroraison	FemiNomInf;
pestiféré	FemiNomInf;
pharmacopée	FemiNomInf;
photo	FemiNomInf;
physiocrate	FemiNomInf;
pierrette	FemiNomInf;
pirate	FemiNomInf;
planère	FemiNomInf;
plombémie	FemiNomInf;
poignée	FemiNomInf;
polycétone	FemiNomInf;
populace	FemiNomInf;
pote	FemiNomInf;
pouteille	FemiNomInf;
prééminence	FemiNomInf;
présente	FemiNomInf;
prise	FemiNomInf;
prolongation	FemiNomInf;
prostitution	FemiNomInf;
prunelle	FemiNomInf;
psychophysique	FemiNomInf;
pureté	FemiNomInf;
quadrille	FemiNomInf;
queue-de-pie	FemiNomInf;
radinerie	FemiNomInf;
raffinerie	FemiNomInf;
ratatouille	FemiNomInf;
réceptionnaire	FemiNomInf;
récréation	FemiNomInf;
refondation	FemiNomInf;
réhydratation	FemiNomInf;
remontrance	FemiNomInf;
replantation	FemiNomInf;
résistance	FemiNomInf;
rétrofusée	FemiNomInf;
rhinorrhée	FemiNomInf;
rivalité	FemiNomInf;
rosse	FemiNomInf;
rudesse	FemiNomInf;
sablière	FemiNomInf;
salle	FemiNomInf;
sarigue	FemiNomInf;
scatologie	FemiNomInf;
scottish	FemiNomInf;
sédimentologie	FemiNomInf;
sénarmontite	FemiNomInf;
sérigraphe	FemiNomInf;
sextape	FemiNomInf;
similitude	FemiNomInf;
Slovaque	FemiNomInf;
sole	FemiNomInf;
sophrologie	FemiNomInf;
soumission	FemiNomInf;
spallation	FemiNomInf;
spirite	FemiNomInf;
sténocardie	FemiNomInf;
stupeur	FemiNomInf;
suicidalité	FemiNomInf;
suprématie	FemiNomInf;
surpopulation	FemiNomInf;
synapse	FemiNomInf;
tachiste	FemiNomInf;
tangage	FemiNomInf;
taule	FemiNomInf;
télécabine	FemiNomInf;
témérité	FemiNomInf;
terminologue	FemiNomInf;
théière	FemiNomInf;
thixotropie	FemiNomInf;
toile	FemiNomInf;
torpeur	FemiNomInf;
toxémie	FemiNomInf;
trame	FemiNomInf;
travée	FemiNomInf;
triglycéridémie	FemiNomInf;
trottinette	FemiNomInf;
turcophone	FemiNomInf;
ultragauche	FemiNomInf;
urolagnie	FemiNomInf;
vadrouille	FemiNomInf;
vase	FemiNomInf;
vente	FemiNomInf;
verve	FemiNomInf;
vieillesse	FemiNomInf;
virtuosité	FemiNomInf;
vodka	FemiNomInf;
voûte	FemiNomInf;
Wikipédia	FemiNomInf;
yeuse	FemiNomInf;
zoolâtrie	FemiNomInf;
économe	FemiNomInf;
